Missouri, session 2026, SB1051.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 160 and 173, RSMo, are amended by
adding thereto four new sections, to be known as sections
160.014, 160.015, 173.001, and 173.002, to read as follows:
160.014. 1. As used in this section and section
160.015, the following terms mean:
(1) "Antisemitism" or "antisemitic", the International
Holocaust Remembrance Alliance's (IHRA) Working Definition
of Antisemitism, including its contemporary examples, as it
was adopted on May 26, 2016, as a tool and guide for
recognizing and combating antisemitism;
(2) "Educational institution", each public school and
school district in this state.
2. Each educational institution shall treat harassment
or discrimination against students or employees or resulting
from institutional policies or programs on such educational
institution's campuses that is motivated by or including
antisemitism in an identical manner to discrimination
motivated by race.
3. (1) Each educational institution shall integrate
the definition of antisemitism in this section into such

SB 1051 2
educational institution's student, faculty, and employee
codes of conduct and shall prohibit such conduct at or by
such educational institution if such conduct creates an
atmosphere or circumstance in which individuals working at,
visiting, or attending the educational institution are
impeded from their normal course of work, study, or access
to the educational institution and the educational
institution's services and facilities either by physically
impeding such activity or by creating an atmosphere of fear
or intimidation.
(2) Prohibited conduct as it relates specifically to
antisemitism shall be incorporated into such educational
institution's student, faculty, and employee codes of
conduct and shall include penalties for harassment of and
discrimination against Jews in compliance with
antidiscrimination regulations promulgated under Title VI of
the federal Civil Rights Act of 1964, as amended, by the
United States Department of Education and the United States
Department of Justice.
4. (1) Criticism of Israel that is similar to
criticism toward any other country shall not be construed to
be antisemitic.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
diminish or infringe upon any right protected under the
First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States or
the Constitution of Missouri.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
conflict with federal or state discrimination laws.
160.015. 1. (1) No educational institution shall
discriminate because of race, ethnicity, national origin,
sex, disability, religion, or marital status against a
student or an employee of any educational institution.

SB 1051 3
(2) No person in this state shall, on the basis of
race, ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion,
or marital status, be excluded from participation in, denied
the benefits of, or subjected to discrimination under any
program or activity or in any employment conditions or
practices conducted by an educational institution that
receives or benefits from federal or state financial
assistance.
2. An educational institution's criteria for admission
to a program or course shall not have the effect of
restricting access by persons of a particular race,
ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion, or
marital status.
3. (1) All of an educational institution's classes
shall be available to all students without regard to race,
ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion, or
marital status.
(2) This subsection shall not be construed to
eliminate the provision of programs designed to meet the
needs of students with limited proficiency in English,
gifted students, or students with disabilities or programs
tailored to students with specialized talents or skills.
4. Guidance services, counseling services, and
financial assistance services in an educational institution
shall be available to all students equally and provided in
the same manner regardless of race, ethnicity, national
origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital status.
5. All education programs, activities, and
opportunities offered by educational institutions shall be
made available without discrimination on the basis of race,
ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion, or
marital status.

SB 1051 4
6. (1) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
diminish or infringe upon any right protected under the
First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States or
the Constitution of Missouri.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
conflict with federal or state discrimination laws.
7. (1) Each educational institution shall report
incidents and complaints of antisemitic discrimination or
harassment to the Title VI coordinator at the department of
elementary and secondary education.
(2) The Title VI coordinator shall establish,
maintain, and publicize a formal reporting process whereby
students, parents, staff, and faculty can submit complaints
of antisemitic discrimination and harassment.
(3) The Title VI coordinator shall thoroughly
investigate all complaints made under this subsection.
After a reasonable investigation, if the coordinator
determines that an educational institution has engaged in,
allowed, or failed to sufficiently prohibit antisemitic
discrimination or harassment, the department of elementary
and secondary education shall notify, in writing, the
educational institution of such determination and that such
educational institution is required to address the issues
described in such determination within thirty days after
receipt of such written notice.
(4) After the expiration of the thirty days to address
issues in the coordinator's determination, if the Title VI
coordinator determines the educational institution has
failed to take the necessary actions to address such issues,
the department of elementary and secondary education shall
report the coordinator's determination to the United States
Department of Education and the United States Department of

SB 1051 5
Justice by making a complaint under Title VI of the federal
Civil Rights Act of 1964, as amended.
(5) The Title VI coordinator shall compile an annual
report on complaints of antisemitic discrimination and
harassment monitored, reported, and investigated under this
section. Such report shall be published on the website of
the department of elementary and secondary education and
submitted to the general assembly before July first of each
year.
173.001. 1. As used in this section and section
173.002, the following terms mean:
(1) "Antisemitism" or "antisemitic", the International
Holocaust Remembrance Alliance's (IHRA) Working Definition
of Antisemitism, including its contemporary examples, as it
was adopted on May 26, 2016, as a tool and guide for
recognizing and combating antisemitism;
(2) "Educational institution", a public postsecondary
educational institution governed or supervised by a:
(a) Board erected under chapter 172, 174, 175, or 178;
(b) Board of trustees of a community college; or
(c) State board for any other technical school.
2. Each educational institution shall treat harassment
or discrimination against students or employees or resulting
from institutional policies or programs on such educational
institution's campuses that is motivated by or including
antisemitism in an identical manner to discrimination
motivated by race.
3. (1) Each educational institution shall integrate
the definition of antisemitism in this section into such
educational institution's student, faculty, and employee
codes of conduct and shall prohibit such conduct at or by
such educational institution if such conduct creates an

SB 1051 6
atmosphere or circumstance in which individuals working at,
visiting, or attending the educational institution are
impeded from their normal course of work, study, or access
to the educational institution and the educational
institution's services and facilities either by physically
impeding such activity or by creating an atmosphere of fear
or intimidation.
(2) Prohibited conduct as it relates specifically to
antisemitism shall be incorporated into such educational
institution's student, faculty, and employee codes of
conduct and shall include penalties for harassment of and
discrimination against Jews in compliance with
antidiscrimination regulations promulgated under Title VI of
the federal Civil Rights Act of 1964, as amended, by the
United States Department of Education and the United States
Department of Justice.
4. (1) Criticism of Israel that is similar to
criticism toward any other country shall not be construed to
be antisemitic.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
diminish or infringe upon any right protected under the
First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States or
the Constitution of Missouri.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
conflict with federal or state discrimination laws.
173.002. 1. (1) No educational institution shall
discriminate because of race, ethnicity, national origin,
sex, disability, religion, or marital status against a
student or an employee of any educational institution.
(2) No person in this state shall, on the basis of
race, ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion,
or marital status, be excluded from participation in, denied

SB 1051 7
the benefits of, or subjected to discrimination under any
program or activity or in any employment conditions or
practices conducted by an educational institution that
receives or benefits from federal or state financial
assistance.
2. An educational institution's criteria for admission
to a program or course shall not have the effect of
restricting access by persons of a particular race,
ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion, or
marital status.
3. (1) All of an educational institution's classes
shall be available to all students without regard to race,
ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion, or
marital status.
(2) This subsection shall not be construed to
eliminate the provision of programs designed to meet the
needs of students with limited proficiency in English,
gifted students, or students with disabilities or programs
tailored to students with specialized talents or skills.
4. Guidance services, counseling services, and
financial assistance services in an educational institution
shall be available to all students equally and provided in
the same manner regardless of race, ethnicity, national
origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital status.
5. All educational programs, activities, and
opportunities offered by educational institutions shall be
made available without discrimination on the basis of race,
ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion, or
marital status.
6. (1) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
diminish or infringe upon any right protected under the

SB 1051 8
First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States or
the Constitution of Missouri.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
conflict with federal or state discrimination laws.
7. (1) Each educational institution shall report
incidents and complaints of antisemitic discrimination or
harassment to the Title VI coordinator of the coordinating
board for higher education, under the department of higher
education and workforce development.
(2) The Title VI coordinator shall establish,
maintain, and publicize a formal reporting process whereby
students, parents, staff, and faculty can submit complaints
of antisemitic discrimination and harassment.
(3) The Title VI coordinator shall thoroughly
investigate all complaints made under this subsection.
After a reasonable investigation, if the coordinator
determines that an educational institution has engaged in,
allowed, or failed to sufficiently prohibit antisemitic
discrimination or harassment, the coordinating board for
higher education shall notify, in writing, the educational
institution of such determination and that such educational
institution is required to address the issues described in
such determination within thirty days after receipt of such
written notice.
(4) After the expiration of the thirty days to address
issues in the coordinator's determination, if the Title VI
coordinator determines the educational institution has
failed to take the necessary actions to address such issues,
the coordinating board for higher education shall report the
coordinator's determination to the United States Department
of Education and the United States Department of Justice by

SB 1051 9
making a complaint under Title VI of the federal Civil
Rights Act of 1964, as amended.
(5) The Title VI coordinator shall compile an annual
report on complaints of antisemitic discrimination and
harassment monitored, reported, and investigated under this
section. Such report shall be published on the website of
the coordinating board for higher education and submitted to
the general assembly before July first of each year.
✓